Washington statutes.
RCW 43.136.090

Economic impact report.

By December 1, 2020, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the joint legislative audit and review committee must provide an economic impact report to the legislature evaluating the impacts of changes made in chapter 207, Laws of 2014 regarding the leasehold tax and property tax treatment of property owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe. The economic impact report must indicate: The number of parcels and uses of land involved; the economic impacts to tribal governments; state and local government revenue reductions, increases, and shifts from all tax sources affected; impacts on public infrastructure and public services; impacts on business investment and business competition; a description of the types of business activities affected; impacts on the number of jobs created or lost; and any other data the joint legislative audit and review committee deems necessary in determining the economic impacts of chapter 207, Laws of 2014.

[ 2014 c 207 s 11.]

NOTES:

Application—2014 c 207: See note following RCW 84.36.010.